Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-661
Shoulder, defined.

Shoulder shall mean that part of the highway contiguous to the roadway and designed for the accommodation of stopped vehicles, for emergency use, and for lateral support of the base and surface courses of the roadway.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 157.